Texas statutes.
TRANSPORTATION CODE

TITLE 7. VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC

SUBTITLE J. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

CHAPTER 726. TESTING AND INSPECTION OF MOTOR VEHICLES BY CERTAIN MUNICIPALITIES

Sec. 726.001. APPLICABILITY. (a) This chapter applies only to a municipality with a population of more than 290,000.

(b) This section or an ordinance adopted under this section does not apply to a motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer operated under a registration certificate issued under Chapter 643.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 30.166, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 726.002. TESTING AND INSPECTION OF MOTOR VEHICLES. A municipality may adopt an ordinance:

(1) requiring each resident of the municipality, including a corporation having its principal office or place of business in the municipality, who owns a motor vehicle used for the transportation of persons or property and each person operating a motor vehicle on the public thoroughfares of the municipality to have each motor vehicle owned or operated, as appropriate, tested and inspected not more than four times in each calendar year;

(2) requiring each motor vehicle involved in a collision to be tested and inspected before it may be operated on the public thoroughfares of the municipality; or

(3) requiring that a motor vehicle operated on the public thoroughfares of the municipality be tested, inspected, and approved by the testing and inspecting authority.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 709 (H.B. 2190), Sec. 106, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 726.003. MOTOR VEHICLE TESTING STATIONS; TESTING AND INSPECTION FEE. (a) A municipality may acquire, establish, improve, operate, and maintain motor vehicle testing stations and pay for the stations from fees charged for testing and inspecting motor vehicles.

(b) A municipality may impose a fee for the testing and inspecting of a motor vehicle. The fee may not exceed $1 a year. Fees collected under this subsection shall be placed in a separate fund from which may be paid the costs in connection with automotive and safety education programs and the acquisition, establishment, improvement, operation, and maintenance of the testing stations.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 726.004. FINANCING OF MOTOR VEHICLE TESTING STATIONS. (a) A municipality may borrow money to finance all or part of the cost of the acquisition, establishment, improvement, or repair of motor vehicle testing stations and may pledge all or part of the fees or other receipts derived from the operation of the stations for payment of principal and interest on the loan.

(b) A municipality may encumber a testing station, including things acquired pertaining to the station, to secure the payment of funds to construct all or part of the station or to improve, operate, or maintain the station. An encumbrance is not a debt of the municipality but is solely a charge on the property encumbered and may not be considered in determining the power of the municipality to issue bonds.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.